District of Columbia statutes.
13-101

Repealed

Prescription of rules by courts.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 142(1)(A)
1981 Ed., § 13-101.
Section 25(a) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 13 is designated Title 13 of the District of Columbia Official Code.